Tennessee statutes. Title 44 Animals And Animal Husbandry
Chapter 18

Feedlots, Dairy Farms and Poultry Production Houses

44-18-101. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Dairy farm” means any place or premises where one (1) or more cows are kept and from which a part or all of the milk or milk products is provided, sold or offered for sale to a milk plant, transfer station or receiving station;

“Department” means the department of environment and conservation, and includes any officer, agency or designee of that department;

“Established date of operation” means the date on which a feedlot, dairy farm or poultry production house commenced operating. If the physical facilities of the feedlot, dairy farm or poultry production house are subsequently expanded, the established date of operation for each expansion is deemed to be a separate and independent “established date of operation” established as of this date of commencement of the expanded operations, and the commencement of expanded operations shall not divest the feedlot, dairy farm or poultry production house of a previously established date of operation;

“Established date of ownership” means the date of the recording of an appropriate muniment of title establishing the ownership of realty;

“Feedlot” means a lot, yard, corral or other area in which livestock are confined, primarily for the purposes of feeding, growing, raising, or birthing prior to slaughter. “Feedlot” does not include areas that are used for the raising of crops or other vegetation upon which livestock are allowed to graze or feed;

“Livestock” means all equine as well as animals that are being raised primarily for use as food or fiber for human utilization or consumption including, but not limited to, cattle, sheep, swine, goats, and poultry;

“Materially affects” means prohibits or regulates with respect to the location, or the emission of noise, effluent, odors, sewage, waste or similar products resulting from the operation or the location or use of buildings, machinery, vehicles, equipment or other real or personal property used in the operation of a livestock feedlot, dairy farm or poultry production house;

“Nuisance” means and includes public or private nuisance as defined either by statute or by the common law;

“Nuisance action or proceeding” means and includes every action, claim or proceeding, whether brought at law, in equity or as an administrative proceeding, that is based on nuisance;

“Owner or operator” means any person who owns, leases, operates, controls or supervises a feedlot;

“Poultry production house” means any place or premises where chickens are kept for the production of eggs or broilers for resale to processors, wholesalers or retailers;

“Regulations” means a resolution by the county legislative body or an ordinance by the governing body of any municipality regulating or prohibiting the normal noises of animals or fowls, the noises in the operation of the equipment, the odors normally associated with any feedlot, dairy farm, or poultry production house, or the preclusion of any animals or fowls from within the city or from within a defined area of the county;

“Rule of the department” means a rule as defined in the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, that materially affects the operation of a feedlot, dairy farm, or poultry production house and that has been adopted by the department. Nothing in this chapter shall be deemed to empower the department to make any rule; and

“Zoning requirement” means a regulation or ordinance that has been adopted by a city, county, township, school district, or any special-purpose district or authority, that materially affects the operation of a feedlot, dairy farm or poultry production house. Nothing in this chapter shall be deemed to empower any agency described in this definition to make any regulation or ordinance.

Acts 1979, ch. 138, § 1; T.C.A., § 53-6701; Acts 1992, ch. 693, § 1; 1996, ch. 792, § 2; 2002, ch. 635, §§ 1, 2.

Cross-References. Egg promotion board, §43-29-120.

Right to farm, title 43, ch. 26.

Comparative Legislation. Nuisance — Feedlots, dairy farms and egg houses:

Ala. Code §6-5-127.

Ark. Code §2-4-101 et seq.

Ga. O.C.G.A. §41-1-7.

Ky. Rev. Stat. Ann. § 413.072.

Miss. Code Ann. §95-3-29.

Mo. Rev. Stat. § 537.295.

N.C. Gen. Stat. § 106-700 et seq.

Va. Code § 3.1-22.28 et seq.

Cited: Shore v. Maple Lane Farms, LLC, — S.W.3d —, 2012 Tenn. App. LEXIS 229 (Tenn. Ct. App. Apr. 11, 2012).

Collateral References. Nuisance
6.

44-18-102. Nuisance action or proceeding against feedlot, dairy farm or poultry production house.

In any nuisance action or proceeding against a feedlot, dairy farm, or poultry production house brought by or on behalf of a person whose date of ownership of realty is subsequent to the established date of operation of the feedlot, dairy farm or poultry production house, proof of compliance with §§ 44-18-103 and 44-18-104 shall be an absolute defense; provided, that the conditions or circumstances alleged to constitute a nuisance are subject to regulatory jurisdiction in accordance with § 44-18-103 or § 44-18-104.

In any nuisance action or proceeding against a feedlot, dairy farm or poultry production house brought by or on behalf of a person whose date of ownership of realty precedes the established date of operation of the feedlot, dairy farm or poultry production house, but whose actual or proposed use of the realty for residential or commercial purposes is subsequent to the established date of operation of the feedlot, dairy farm or poultry production house, proof of compliance with §§ 44-18-103 and 44-18-104 shall be an absolute defense; provided, that the conditions or circumstances alleged to constitute a nuisance are subject to regulatory jurisdiction in accordance with § 44-18-103 or § 44-18-104.

The normal noises and appearance of the animals or fowls, the noises in the operation of the equipment or the appearance of the equipment, the odors normally associated with any feedlot, dairy farm or poultry production house, the appearance of a feedlot, dairy farm or poultry production house, or litter and/or manure additive that is designed to bind soluble phosphorous in conformity with the Tennessee Natural Resources Conservation Service (NRCS) interim conservation practice standard if used by any feedlot, dairy farm or poultry production house, shall not constitute grounds for any nuisance action or proceeding against a feedlot, dairy farm or poultry production house brought by or on behalf of a person whose date of ownership of realty is subsequent to the established date of operation of the feedlot, dairy farm or poultry production house.

Acts 1979, ch. 138, § 2; T.C.A., § 53-6702; Acts 2002, ch. 635, §§ 2, 3.

44-18-103. Applicability of rules of department.

This section shall apply to the department's rules except for rules required for delegation of the national pollutant discharge elimination system permit program pursuant to the Federal Water Pollution Control Act, Section 402, Public Law 92-500, 33 U.S.C. 1342, as amended.

The applicability of rules of the department, other than those issued under the Tennessee Air Quality Act, compiled in title 68, chapter 201, part 1, shall be as follows:

A rule of the department in effect before April 12, 1979, shall apply to a feedlot, dairy farm or poultry production house with an established date of operation prior to April 12, 1979;

A rule of the department shall apply to a feedlot, dairy farm or poultry production house with an established date of operation subsequent to the effective date of the rule;

A rule of the department adopted after April 12, 1979, shall not apply to a feedlot, dairy farm or poultry production house holding any department permit and having an established date of operation prior to the effective date of the rule; and

A rule of the department adopted after April 12, 1979, shall not apply to a feedlot, dairy farm or poultry production house not previously required to hold a department permit and having an established date of operation prior to the effective date of the rule.

The applicability of rules promulgated under the “Tennessee Air Quality Act,” compiled in title 68, chapter 201, part 1, shall be as follows:

A rule of the department or the air pollution control board in effect on April 12, 1979, shall apply to a feedlot, dairy farm or poultry production house with an established date of operation prior to April 12, 1979;

A rule of the department or the air pollution control board shall apply to a feedlot, dairy farm or poultry production house with an established date of operation subsequent to the effective date of the rule; and

A rule of the department or the air pollution control board pertaining to a feedlot, dairy farm or poultry production house adopted after April 12, 1979, shall not apply to any feedlot, dairy farm or poultry production house having an established date of operation prior to the effective date of the rule.

Acts 1979, ch. 138, § 3; T.C.A., § 53-6703; Acts 1992, ch. 693, § 1; 2002, ch. 635, § 2.

44-18-104. Applicability of zoning requirements and regulations.

The applicability of zoning requirements is as follows:

A zoning requirement shall apply to a feedlot, dairy farm or poultry production house with an established date of operation subsequent to the effective date of the zoning requirements;

A zoning requirement shall not apply to a feedlot, dairy farm or poultry production house with an established date of operation prior to the effective date of the zoning requirement;

A zoning requirement that is in effect on April 12, 1979, shall apply to a feedlot, dairy farm or poultry production house with an established date of operation prior to April 12, 1979; and

A zoning requirement adopted by a city shall not apply to a feedlot, dairy farm or poultry production house that becomes located within an incorporated or unincorporated area subject to regulation by that city by virtue of an incorporation or annexation that takes effect after April 12, 1979.

A person shall comply with this section as a matter of law where no zoning requirement exists.

The applicability of regulations shall be as follows:

A regulation shall apply to a feedlot, dairy farm or poultry production house with an established date of operation subsequent to the effective date of such regulation;

A regulation shall not apply to a feedlot, dairy farm or poultry production house with an established date of operation prior to the effective date of the regulation;

A regulation that is in effect on April 12, 1979, shall apply to a feedlot, dairy farm or poultry production house with an established date of operation prior to April 12, 1979; and

A regulation adopted by a city shall not apply to a feedlot, dairy farm or poultry production house that becomes located within an incorporated or unincorporated area subject to regulation by such city by virtue of an incorporation or annexation that takes effect after April 12, 1979.

A person shall comply with this section as a matter of law where no regulation exists.

Acts 1979, ch. 138, § 4; T.C.A., § 53-6704; Acts 2002, ch. 635, § 2.

Attorney General Opinions. Based on the applicable definitions of “agriculture” and “agricultural,” concentrated animal feeding operations (CAFOs) clearly involve “agricultural” activities and the “agricultural” use of land and structures. Thus, a county is not authorized to regulate CAFOs under its zoning powers or its general powers. T.C.A. §44-18-104 merely sets forth which zoning requirements and regulations apply when determining whether a feedlot, dairy farm, or poultry production house is to be afforded absolute immunity from a nuisance claim, but it does not provide authority for a county to enact zoning requirements or regulations. T.C.A. §13-7-114, which prevents counties from using their zoning power to regulate structures and land used for agricultural purposes, is not in conflict with T.C.A. §44-18-104 because there is no independent source of zoning power bestowed upon any local entity under this right-to-farm law. T.C.A §44-18-104(b) and (d) do not direct compliance with the section when no zoning requirements or regulations exist. When no zoning requirements or regulations exist, these provisions convey that a person’s compliance with the section is deemed to be established as a matter of law. OAG 18-30, 2018 Tenn. AG LEXIS 29 (7/6/2018).

Cited: Shore v. Maple Lane Farms, LLC, — S.W.3d —, 2012 Tenn. App. LEXIS 229 (Tenn. Ct. App. Apr. 11, 2012).